Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-136.01
Vehicle identification number, defined.

Vehicle identification number means a series of English letters or Arabic or Roman numerals assigned to a vehicle for identification purposes.

Laws 2007, LB286, § 8.